Utah statutes.
16-10a-621.   Issuance of shares.
(1)  The powers granted in this section to the board of directors may be
reserved to the shareholders by the articles of incorporation.
(2)  The board of directors may authorize the issuance of shares for
consideration consisting of any tangible or intangible property or benefit to
the corporation, including cash, promissory notes, services performed,
contracts or arrangements for services to be performed, or other securities of
the corporation.  The terms and conditions of any tangible or intangible
property or benefit to be provided in the future to the corporation, including
contracts or arrangements for services to be performed, shall be set forth in
writing.  However, the failure to set forth the terms and conditions in
writing does not affect the validity of the issuance of any shares issued for
any consideration, or their status as fully paid and nonassessable shares.
(3)  Before the corporation issues shares, the board of directors shall
determine that the consideration received or to be received for the shares to
be issued is adequate.  The board of directors' determination regarding the
adequacy of consideration for the issuance of shares is conclusive for the
purpose of determining whether the shares are validly issued, fully paid, and
nonassessable.
(4)  When the corporation receives the consideration for which the board of
directors authorized the issuance of shares, the shares issued therefor are
fully paid and nonassessable.
(5)  The corporation may place in escrow shares issued in consideration for
contracts or arrangements for future services or benefits or in consideration
for a promissory note, or make other arrangements to restrict the transfer of
the shares issued for any such consideration, and may credit distributions in
respect of the shares against their purchase price, until the services are
performed, the note is paid, or the benefits are received.  If specified
future services are not performed, the note is not paid, or the benefits are
not received, the shares escrowed or restricted and the distributions credited
may be cancelled in whole or part.
(6)  The board of directors may authorize a committee of the board of
directors, or an officer of the corporation, to authorize or approve the
issuance or sale, or contract for sale of shares, within limits specifically
prescribed by the board of directors.
